California statutes. Public Contract Code
The district may contract with the federal government of the United States or any branch thereof, or with any county, city and county, municipal corporation, district or other public corporation or with any person, firm or corporation, for the joint acquisition or construction or use of any sewer or sewers or other works or facilities for the handling, treatment, or disposal of sewage or industrial waste from the district and such other area as may be designated in said contract, when, in the judgment of the legislative body of said district, it is for the best interests of the district so to do. Any such contract may provide for the construction and maintenance of such sewer or sewers, or such other works or facilities, and for the payment by or for the parties thereto of such proportionate part of the cost of the acquisition, construction or maintenance of such sewer or sewers or other works or facilities as may be stated in said contract, the payments to be made at such times and in such amounts as may be provided by said contract. Any such contract may provide for the joint use of any sewer or sewers, works or facilities for the handling, treatment or disposal of sewage or industrial waste upon such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon by the parties thereto, and for the flowage, treatment or disposal of sewage or industrial waste from such area for each of the parties thereto as may be described in the contract.

Any district which has acquired or constructed or which proposes to acquire or construct, any sewer or sewers, or works or other facilities for the handling, treatment or disposal of sewage or industrial waste, may contract with the federal government of the United States or any branch thereof, or with any county, city and county, municipal corporation, district or other public corporation or with any person, firm or corporation for the use of any such sewer or sewers, works or facilities by any such county, city and county, municipal corporation, district or other public corporation, or for the flowage, treatment or disposal of sewage or industrial waste from any area designated by such person, firm or corporation so contracting, upon such terms and conditions as may be provided in said contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 94.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 52. Sanitary Districts [20800. - 20806.]

20800.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by sanitary districts as provided in the Sanitary District Act of 1923 pursuant to Division 6 (commencing with Section 6400) of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 95.)
-------------------------------------------

20801.

“District project,” as used in this article, means any construction, reconstruction, alteration, enlargement, renewal, or replacement of sewer facilities which the district is authorized to do, including, but not limited to, the furnishing of supplies or materials for any such work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 95.)
-------------------------------------------

20803.

When the expenditure required for a district project exceeds fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), it shall be contracted for and let to the lowest responsible bidder after notice, subject to Section 20805.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 142, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

20804.

The notice inviting bids shall set a date for the opening of bids. The first publication or posting of the notice shall be at least 10 days before the date of opening the bids. Notice shall be published at least twice, not less than five days apart, in a newspaper of general circulation, circulated within the district, or if there is none, it shall be posted in at least three public places in the district that have been designated by resolution as the places for posting public notices. The notice shall distinctly state the project to be done.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 95.)
-------------------------------------------

20804.5.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

20805.

In its discretion, the district board may reject any bids presented and readvertise. If two or more bids are the same and the lowest, the district board may accept the one it chooses. If no bids are received the district board may have the project done without further complying with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 95.)
-------------------------------------------

20806.

If there is an emergency, or if it is necessary to do emergency work to prepare for national or local defense, the district board may pass a resolution by a four-fifths vote of its members declaring that the public interest and necessity demand the immediate expenditure of district funds to safeguard life, health, or property. Upon adoption of the resolution, it may expend any sum required in the emergency without complying with this article. If notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall also comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 53. Fire Protection Districts [20810. - 20813.]

20810.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by fire protection districts as provided for in the Fire Protection District Law pursuant to Division 12 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 96.)
-------------------------------------------

20811.

When a district board determines that it is in the public interest, a district may contract with any other public agency for fire protection services, rescue services, emergency medical services, hazardous material emergency response services, ambulance services, and any other emergency services for the protection of lives and property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1013, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

20812.

(a) A district board may contract for special services. These contracts shall be with persons specially trained, experienced, expert, and competent to perform the special services. The special services shall be limited to the fields of accounting, administration, ambulance, architecture, custodial, economics, engineering, finance, insurance, labor relations, law, maintenance, mechanics, medicine, planning, science, technology, and other services which are incidental to the operation of the district.

(b) In the case of a district which has a final budget in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000), the district shall follow the contracting and purchasing procedures which apply to the county government of its principal county or the procedures in subdivision (c).

(c) In the case of a district which has a final budget less than one million dollars ($1,000,000), the district shall follow the procedures of this subdivision.

(1) When the expenditure required for the service contract exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), it shall be contracted for and let to the lowest responsible bidder. If two or more bids are the same and the lowest, the district board may accept the one it chooses.

(2) The notice inviting bids shall set a date for the opening of bids. The first publication or posting of the notice shall be at least 10 days before the date of opening the bids. Notice shall be published at least twice, at least five days apart, in a newspaper of general circulation in the district, or if there is none, it shall be posted in at least three public places in the district. The notice shall distinctly state the service to be performed.

(3) The district board may reject any bids. If the district board rejects all bids, it may either readvertise or adopt a resolution, by two-thirds vote, declaring that the service can be performed more economically by the district’s employees or obtained at a lower price in the open market. Upon adoption of the resolution, the district board may undertake the service contract without further complying with this section.

(4) If no bids are received, the district board may undertake the service contract without further complying with this section.

(5) In the case of an emergency, the district board shall respond to the emergency pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050) if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 261, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

20813.

(a) All contracts for the construction or completion of any building, structure, or improvement, when the expenditure required for the work exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000), shall be contracted for and let to the lowest responsible bidder after notice. If two or more bids are the same and the lowest, the district board may accept the one it chooses.

(b) The notice inviting bids shall set a date for the opening of bids. The first publication or posting of the notice shall be at least 10 days before the date of opening the bids. Notice shall be published at least twice, not less than five days apart, in a newspaper of general circulation in the district, or if there is none, it
 shall be posted in at least three public places in the district. The notice shall distinctly state the work to be done.

(c) In its discretion, the district board may reject any bids presented and readvertise.

(d) In the case of an emergency, the district board may act pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(e) The district board may, subject to the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9550) of Title 3 of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code, require the posting of those bonds it deems desirable as a condition to the filing of a bid or the letting of a contract.

(f) Cost records of the work shall be kept in the manner provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 4000) of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 53.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 53.5. Recreation and Park Districts [20815. - 20815.5.]

20815.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by recreation and park districts as provided in the Recreation and Park District Law, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 5780) of Division 5 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

20815.1.

(a) All contracts for new construction estimated to cost in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder after competitive bidding.

(b) All contracts for alterations, maintenance, or repairs estimated to cost in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder after competitive bidding.

(c) All contracts for materials and supplies not related to new construction, alterations, maintenance, or repairs estimated to cost in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder after competitive bidding.

(d) A district may purchase in the open market without calling for bids, materials and supplies estimated to cost less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for use in the work either under contract or by force account.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

20815.3.

(a) A district shall publish notice inviting bids for any contract for which competitive bidding is required at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the district at least one week before the time specified for receiving bids. The notice shall distinctly state the work to be done.

(b) In its discretion, the board of directors may do any of the following:

(1) Reject all bids and readvertise.

(2) By a four-fifths vote, elect to purchase the materials or supplies in the open market.

(3) By a four-fifths vote, elect to construct the building, structure, or improvement by force account.

(c) In the case of an emergency, the board of directors may act pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(d) The board of directors may, subject to the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9550) of Title 3 of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code, require the posting of those bonds it deems as a condition to the filing of a bid or the letting of a contract.

(e) The district shall keep cost records of the work pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 4000) of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 54.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

20815.5.

Notwithstanding Sections 20815.1 and 20815.3, a district may use the provisions of the Uniform Public Construction Cost Accounting Act, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 22000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 54. Public Entities—Community Facilities Law of 1911 [20820. - 20826.]

20820.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by public entities as provided for in the Community Facilities Law of 1911 pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Part 3 of Division 5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 97.)
-------------------------------------------

20823.

Any contract for the construction of any improvement may be let and entered into as other contracts for similar work are let and entered into by the city. If the improvement includes the acquisition of any property, the city may acquire such property by purchase, gift, eminent domain, or otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 97.)
-------------------------------------------

20824.

Instead of letting contracts for the improvement, the city may itself construct or complete the improvement, and buy the necessary materials, and employ the necessary labor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 97.)
-------------------------------------------

20826.

The city may contract with the federal government of the United States or any branch of it, or with any county, city and county, municipal corporation, district, or other public corporation, or with any person, firm, or corporation, for the joint acquisition or construction or use of any improvement to serve the district and such other area as may be designated in the contract, when, in the judgment of the governing body of the city, it is for the best interests of the district so to do. Any such contract may provide for the acquisition, construction, or maintenance of such improvement and for the payment by or for the parties to the contract of such proportionate part of the cost of such acquisition, construction, or maintenance as may be stated in the contract. The payments shall be made at such times and in such amounts as may be provided by said contract. Any such contract may provide for the joint use of any improvement upon such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon by the parties to the contract, and for the flowage, treatment, or disposal of sewage, industrial waste, surface water, or storm water from such area for each of the parties to the contract as may be described in the contract.

Any city which has acquired or constructed, or which proposes to acquire or construct, any improvement for the benefit of a district may contract with the federal government of the United States or any branch of it, or with any county, city and county, municipal corporation, district, or other public corporation, or with any person, firm, or corporation for the use of any such improvement by any such county, city and county, municipal corporation, district, or other public corporation, or for the flowage, treatment or disposal of sewage, industrial waste, surface water, or storm water from any area designated by such person, firm, or corporation so contracting, upon such terms and conditions as may be provided in the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 97.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 55. Highway Lighting Districts [20830. - 20832.5.]

20830.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by highway lighting districts as provided for in the Highway Lighting District Act pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 19000) of Division 14 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 98.)
-------------------------------------------

20832.

Within 10 days after the establishment of the district, the governing body shall advertise for bids for installing and maintaining the system and for servicing the same. The contract shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder. However, the rates to be paid shall not exceed the lawful rates applicable for the particular class of service and when necessary shall be those authorized by the Public Utilities Commission of the State of California. The contract for service shall be for a period not less than three years from and after the date electric energy and service is first delivered to the lighting district pursuant to such contract and shall be extended automatically thereafter for successive terms of one year each; provided, that the agreement may be terminated by either party upon not less than sixty (60) days’ written notice prior to the expiration date of the original term or any extended term. The governing body shall reserve the right to abrogate the contract whenever service is offered to be supplied at two-thirds of the fixed contract price.

No advertising for bids or awarding of the contract based thereon shall be required when the proposed contract includes the furnishing of electric energy, and the entire area of the district is served, or will be so served, by a single public utility whose rates are subject to regulation by the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 98.)
-------------------------------------------

20832.5.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 53.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 56. Maintenance Districts—Improvement Act of 1911 [20840. - 20843.5.]

20840.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by maintenance districts as provided for in the Improvement Act of 1911 pursuant to Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 99.)
-------------------------------------------

20842.

All contracts shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder. The board shall advertise for two or more days in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county, inviting bids for furnishing labor, material or supplies before any contract is made therefor. The board may require such bonds as it may deem adequate from the successful bidder to secure the faithful performance of the contract and the payment of all claims for labor and materials, and may reject any and all bids. In an emergency, work found by a four-fifths vote of the board to be necessary to protect life or property from impending flood damage may be done by negotiated contract without advertising for bids therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 99.)
-------------------------------------------

20843.

A contract for installing, maintaining and servicing a system of lights in any maintenance district shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder. However, the rates to be paid shall not exceed the lawful rates applicable for the particular class of service and when necessary shall be those authorized by the Public Utilities Commission of the State of California. The contract for service shall be for a period not less than three years from and after the date electric energy and service is first delivered to the maintenance district pursuant to such contract and shall be extended automatically thereafter for successive terms of one year each; provided, that the agreement may be terminated by either party upon not less than 60 days’ written notice prior to the expiration date of the original term or any extended term. The board of supervisors shall reserve the right to abrogate the contract whenever service is offered to be supplied at two-thirds of the fixed contract price.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 99.)
-------------------------------------------

20843.5.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 54.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 57. Public Entities—Improvement Act of 1911 [20850. - 20874.]

20850.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by public entities as provided for in the Improvement Act of 1911 pursuant to Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 100.)
-------------------------------------------

20852.

The superintendent of streets shall advertise for bids for the improvement of the roadbed pursuant to Section 6764 of the Streets and Highways Code. The legislative body shall award the contract for the making of the improvements to the lowest regular responsible bidder. The bidding and awarding of contracts shall be made in the manner provided in Part 3 (commencing with Section 5100) of Division 7 of the Streets and Highways Code for the awarding of contracts for improvements except that no notice of award shall be published.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 113.)
-------------------------------------------

20853.

Immediately upon the award of the contract, the superintendent of streets shall enter into a contract with the person to whom the contract was awarded for making the improvements upon the portions of the streets described in the notice inviting bids, and at the price stated in the bid. The contractor shall execute bonds in the manner required by Section 20426.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 553.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

20854.

Upon the completion of the work and its acceptance, the street superintendent shall make a certificate of completion, together with a statement of the amount due under the terms of the contract for the performance of the work. The certificate shall be countersigned by the mayor and shall be recorded in the office of the superintendent of streets. The contractor thereupon shall be entitled to payment of the full amount of the contract price, and the recording of such certificate shall be sufficient notice to the owner of such track or tracks that the contract price is due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 100.)
-------------------------------------------

20855.

If the contract price is not paid within 30 days from the date of the recording of the certificate, the contractor may file a sworn statement to that effect with the superintendent of streets, who shall record the same in his or her office in the book in which the certificate of acceptance has been recorded. The contractor shall thereupon have a cause of action against the person owning the tracks for the amount of the contract, together with a reasonable attorney’s fee, and shall also have as security for the recovery of such amount, a first lien upon that portion of the track and franchises of the railroad, between whose rails or tracks the work has been performed, which is contained within the corporate limits of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 100.)
-------------------------------------------

20856.

In the action, the certificate of completion shall be and constitute prima facie evidence of the regularity of all proceedings and of the right of the contractor to recover judgment against the person owning the tracks. Execution may be taken out upon the entry of judgment, and levied upon any property of that person which is subject to execution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 100.)
-------------------------------------------

20857.

If the person files a written election to enter upon the direct performance of the work at its own cost and expense, no further proceedings shall be taken in the matter unless such person neglects or fails for 30 days, or for such further time as the legislative body may grant, to make the improvement. If the improvement of the portions of the street required to be improved by such person is not made with diligence or in all respects similar to the improvement of the rest of the street, or with the same materials or under the same specifications, and to the satisfaction of the superintendent of streets, the legislative body may, by resolution entered in its minutes, prescribe such terms and conditions as to it may seem fit and proper before permitting the said person to continue with the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 100.)
-------------------------------------------

20858.

If the person shall, after three days’ notice of the adoption of the resolution, fail to comply with the terms and conditions so prescribed, the legislative body may declare that person to have forfeited its privilege of performing such work under its own direction. Whereupon the street superintendent shall advertise for bids for the performance of the work, or such portion thereof as may remain uncompleted, and the contract therefor shall be awarded and entered into in the manner provided for in this article for the awarding and execution of contracts where the person owning the track has not elected to make the improvements under its own direction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 100.)
-------------------------------------------

20859.

Upon the completion of the improvement, the contractor to whom the contract has been awarded, or his or her assigns, shall be entitled to a certificate of completion from the street superintendent, and shall have the right to collect from the person by suit, the amount specified in the certificate in all respects the same as provided in this article where the contract is let for such work in the first instance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 100.)
-------------------------------------------

20867.

The legislative body shall award the contract for doing the work to the lowest responsible bidder. All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the public entity.

(c) A certified check made payable to the public entity.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the public entity.

The bids shall be delivered, opened, and award of contract made, all as provided by Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 5240) of Part 3 of Division 7 of the Streets and Highways Code, except that no notice of award shall be published. Upon the award being made, the superintendent of streets shall enter into a contract with the person to whom the contract was awarded for doing the work described in the notice inviting bids, and at the price stated in the bid. The contractor shall execute a bond in the manner required by Section 5254 of the Streets and Highways Code.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the public entity beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 55.)
-------------------------------------------

20868.

Upon the completion of the work and its acceptance, the street superintendent shall make a certificate of completion, together with a statement of the amount due under the terms of the contract for the performance of the work. The certificate shall be countersigned by the mayor, and shall be recorded in the office of the superintendent of streets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 100.)
-------------------------------------------

20869.

When the certificate of completion has been recorded the contractor shall be entitled to payment for the full amount of the contract price, and the recording of the certificate shall be sufficient notice to the owner of such track or tracks that such amount is due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 100.)
-------------------------------------------

20870.

If the contract price is not paid within 30 days from the date of the recording of the certificate of completion, the contractor may file a sworn statement to that effect with the superintendent of streets, who shall record the same in his or her office in the book in which the certificate of completion has been recorded. The contractor shall thereupon have a cause of action against the person owning the tracks for the amount of the contract, together with a reasonable attorney’s fee, to be fixed by the court, and shall also have as security for the recovery of such amount, a first lien upon that portion of the track and franchises of that railroad which is contained within the corporate limits of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 100.)
-------------------------------------------

20871.

In the action, the certificate of completion shall be prima facie evidence of the regularity of all proceedings, and of the right of the contractor to recover judgment against the person. Execution may be taken out upon the entry of judgment, and levied upon any property of that person which is subject to execution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 100.)
-------------------------------------------

20872.

If the person files a written election to enter upon the direct performance of such work at its own cost and expense, no further proceedings shall be taken in the matter unless such person neglects or fails for 30 days, or for such further time as the legislative body may, by resolution, grant, to make and complete the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 100.)
-------------------------------------------

20873.

If the work is not done with diligence as in this article provided, the legislative body may, by resolution entered upon its minutes, prescribe such terms and conditions as it may see fit and proper before permitting the person to continue with the work. If the person shall, after three days’ notice of the adoption of the resolution, fail to comply with the terms and conditions so prescribed, the legislative body may, at any time thereafter, declare the person to have forfeited its privilege of performing such work under its own direction. Whereupon the street superintendent shall advertise for bids for the performance of the work, or such portion thereof as may remain uncompleted, and the contract therefor shall be awarded and entered into in the manner provided for in this article for the awarding and execution of contracts where the person has not elected to make the improvements under its own direction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 100.)
-------------------------------------------

20874.

Upon the completion of the improvement, the contractor to whom the contract has been awarded, or his or her assigns, shall be entitled to a certificate of completion from the street superintendent, and shall have the right to collect from the person by suit the amount specified in the certificate in all respects the same as provided in this chapter where the contract is let for such work in the first instance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 100.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 58. Public Entities—Improvement Act of 1911 [20880. - 20886.]

20880.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by public entities as provided for in the Improvement Act of 1911 pursuant to Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 101.)
-------------------------------------------

20886.

Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to relieve any city or public agency, if the work or improvement is to be performed by the city or public agency, from any competitive bidding requirements imposed, as to work performed by the city or public agency, by any charter or statutory provision applicable to it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 101.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 59. Public Entities—Tree Planting Act of 1931 [20890. - 20898.]

20890.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by public entities as provided for in the Tree Planting Act of 1931 pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 22000) of Division 15 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

20893.

The board may direct the city forester to let contracts for all or any part of any improvement ordered by the city council. The city forester shall let the said contracts to the lowest responsible bidder, after notice by publication in two successive issues of any daily, or in one issue of any weekly, newspaper published and circulated in the city, or if there is no such newspaper, by posting for five days at three public places in the city. The work so contracted for shall be done under the supervision of the city forester.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

20893.5.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the local agency.

(c) A certified check made payable to the local agency.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the local agency.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the local agency beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

20894.

If the contractor abandons the work, or fails to proceed with it as rapidly as required by the contract, the city forester may relet the work in the same manner as in the first letting, or complete or cause it to be completed in any other manner he or she deems advisable. The city forester may retain the amount of any expense incidental to the reletting, out of any funds due or to become due to the contractor, and may also hold the contractor and the sureties upon the contractor’s bond responsible for any additional expenses and for any damages resulting from the abandonment or failure to complete the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 554.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

20895.

The legislative body, by contract or otherwise, shall provide for the performance of all work ordered by it pursuant to this article, including the construction and installation of any improvements and the furnishing of maintenance or service for any improvements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

20896.

All or any part of the improvements may be constructed, installed, or owned and all or any part of the maintenance and servicing of any of the improvements may be provided by one or any combination of any of the following:

(a) The local agency conducting proceedings.

(b) Any other public agency.

(c) Any public utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

20897.

The local agency, by contract made with another public agency or with a public utility, may provide for the construction, installation, or ownership of any improvements or for the furnishing of maintenance or service for any improvements. Any contract with another public agency shall be made in compliance with all laws applicable to the other public agency and to the local agency. Any contract with a public utility shall be made in compliance with and subject to all tariffs, rules, and rate schedules of the public utility on file with and approved by the Public Utilities Commission. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a contract may contain such provisions as may be agreed upon by the local agency and the other public agency or the public utility, as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 102.)
-------------------------------------------

20898.

Except for any work provided for by contract made pursuant to Section 20897, the legislative body shall provide for the construction or installation of all improvements and for the furnishing of maintenance and service for any improvements in accordance with and subject to all laws applicable to the local agency, including any laws requiring the letting of contracts after competitive bidding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 102.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 60. Bridge and Highway Districts [20910. - 20919.]

20910.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by bridge and highway districts as provided for in the Bridge and Highway District Act pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 27000) of Division 15 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 256, Sec. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

20914.
